Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2431.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 901 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 901. Scope of enforcement authority.* * *(b.2) Medicaid pharmacy access.--(1) A PBM shall accept and process Medicaid prescriptions from any pharmacy or pharmacist who is in good standing with the department and the State Board of Pharmacy.(2) A PBM may not restrict, limit or otherwise control 123456789101112131415161718192021 the selection of pharmacies available to Medicaid patients based solely on the PBM's private contracting preferences.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2431PN3236 - 2 - 1234